Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB913.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 5 heading of the act of June 28, 1995 (P.L.89, No.18), known as the Conservation and Natural Resources Act, is amended to read:CHAPTER 5[RENAMING DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL RESOURCESAND DEFINING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY OF123456789101112131415161718192021222324 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION]DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL SERVICESSection 2. Section 501 of the act is repealed:[Section 501. Department of Environmental Protection.The Department of Environmental Resources is renamed the Department of Environmental Protection.]Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 501.1. Department of Environmental Services.(a) Renaming of Department of Environmental Protection.--The Department of Environmental Protection is renamed the Department of Environmental Services.(b) References.--A reference to the Department of Environmental Protection in a statute or a regulation shall be deemed a reference to the Department of Environmental Services.(c) Designation.--(1) To provide an efficient and cost-minimizing transition, licenses, contracts, deeds and any other official actions of the Department of Environmental Protection shall not be affected by the use of the designation of the department as the Department of Environmental Services.(2) The Department of Environmental Services may continue to use the name Department of Environmental Protection on badges, licenses, contracts, deeds, stationery and any other official documents until existing supplies are exhausted.(3) The Department of Environmental Protection may substitute the title "Department of Environmental Services" for "Department of Environmental Protection" on its documents and materials on a schedule as it deems appropriate.(d) Signage.--The Department of Environmental Services may 20250HB0913PN0962 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not replace existing signage at department locations with the redesignated name until the signs are worn and in need of replacement. This transition shall be coordinated with changes in administration.(e) Computer systems.--The Department of Environmental Services shall continue to use the name Department of Environmental Protection on its computer systems until the time of routine upgrades in each computer system in the department. The change in name shall be made at the time of the routine upgrade to the department computer systems.Section 4. Sections 503, 504, 507, 508 and 509(a) of the act are amended to read:Section 503. Continued authority of Department of Environmental [Protection] Services, State Conservation Commission and Department of Agriculture.(a) Powers and duties.--The Department of Environmental [Protection] Services shall continue to exercise the same powers and perform the same duties and functions by law vested in and imposed upon the Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection not otherwise amended or transferred by this act to the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.(b) Administrative officers.--All appointive administrative officers holding office in the Department of Environmental [Resources] Protection when this act becomes effective shall continue in office in the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services until the term for which they were respectively appointed shall expire or until they shall die, resign or be removed from office.(c) Sand and gravel permits.--Section 1808(d) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative 20250HB0913PN0962 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Code of 1929, is saved from repeal and the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services and Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission shall continue to exercise the rights, powers and duties thereof, provided that the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission may, by regulation, with the concurrence of the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services, adjust the amount of the royalty payments per ton or cubic foot of usable and/or merchantable sand and/or gravel.Section 504. Energy programs.(a) Building Energy Conservation Act.--The Department of Environmental [Protection] Services has the powers and duties previously vested in the Governor's Energy Council by the act of December 15, 1980 (P.L.1203, No.222), known as the Building Energy Conservation Act.(b) Energy Conservation and Assistance Act.--The Department of Environmental [Protection] Services has the powers and duties previously vested in the Governor's Energy Council by the act of July 10, 1986 (P.L.1398, No.122), known as the Energy Conservation and Assistance Act.(c) Alternative fuels.--The Department of Environmental [Protection] Services has the powers and duties previously vested in the Pennsylvania Energy Office by 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 72 (relating to alternative fuels).(d) Other powers and duties transferred.--Any reference to the Pennsylvania Energy Office in any other act shall be interpreted to mean the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services, and any such powers and duties in such acts and other functions currently performed or administered by the Pennsylvania Energy Office are hereby transferred to the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services.20250HB0913PN0962 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 507. Transfer of funds.The administration of the following funds or portions of funds, as may be administered by the Pennsylvania Energy Office, shall be transferred from the Pennsylvania Energy Office to the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services:(1) Energy Conservation and Assistance Fund.(2) Alternative Fuels Incentive Grant Fund.(3) All other funds or portions of funds currently administered by the Pennsylvania Energy Office.Section 508. Regulations.Any regulations, guidelines or statements of policy issued by the Pennsylvania Energy Office for the functions transferred to the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services shall remain in effect until such time as the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services shall determine the need to amend such regulations, guidelines or statements of policy.Section 509. Transfer of personnel.(a) General rule.--Certain personnel, allocations, appropriations, fixed assets, equipment, files, records, contracts, agreements, obligations and all other materials and supplies which are used, employed or expended by the Pennsylvania Energy Office in connection with the functions transferred by this act to the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services in the first instance shall be transferred from the Pennsylvania Energy Office to the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services and shall be considered as if these contracts, agreements and obligations had been incurred or entered into by the Department of Environmental [Protection] Services.* * *20250HB0913PN0962 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB0913PN0962 - 6 - 1